dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.aff
FLAG long
SFX c4 er assiez/n'q'l'm' [^cg]er
SFX c4 ecer ecassiez/n'q'l'm' ecer
SFX c4 eger egeassiez/n'q'l'm' eger
SFX c4 er assent/n'q'l'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX c4 ecer ecassent/n'q'l'm't's' ecer
SFX c4 eger egeassent/n'q'l'm't's' eger

SFX c5 Y 239
SFX c5 er er/m'q'd'm't's' er
SFX c5 er ant/m'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer ecant/m'q'm't's' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeant/m'q'l't's' eger
SFX c5 er e/q' er
SFX c5 ebrer ebre/n'j'm't' ebrer
SFX c5 ecer ece/n'j'm't' ecer
SFX c5 echer eche/n'j'm't' echer
SFX c5 ecrer ecre/n'j'm't' ecrer
SFX c5 eder ede/n'j'm't' eder
SFX c5 eger ege/n'j'm't' eger
SFX c5 egler egle/n'j'm't' egler
SFX c5 egner egne/n'j'm't' egner
SFX c5 egrer egre/n'j'm't' egrer
SFX c5 eguer egue/n'j'm't' eguer
SFX c5 eler ele/n'j'm't' eler
SFX c5 emer eme/n'j'm't' emer
SFX c5 ener ene/n'j'm't' ener
SFX c5 eper epe/n'j'm't' eper
SFX c5 equer eque/n'j'm't' equer
SFX c5 erer ere/n'j'm't' erer
SFX c5 eser ese/n'j'm't' eser
SFX c5 eter ete/n'j'm't' eter
SFX c5 etrer etre/n'j'm't' etrer
SFX c5 evrer evre/n'j'm't' evrer
SFX c5 eyer eye/n'j'm't' eyer
SFX c5 ebrer ebres/n'm't' ebrer
SFX c5 ecer eces/n'm't' ecer
SFX c5 echer eches/n'm't' echer
SFX c5 ecrer ecres/n'm't' ecrer
SFX c5 eder edes/n'm't' eder
SFX c5 eger eges/n'm't' eger
SFX c5 egler egles/n'm't' egler
SFX c5 egner egnes/n'm't' egner
SFX c5 egrer egres/n'm't' egrer
SFX c5 eguer egues/n'm't' eguer
SFX c5 eler eles/n'm't' eler
SFX c5 emer emes/n'm't' emer
SFX c5 ener enes/n'm't' ener
SFX c5 eper epes/n'm't' eper
SFX c5 equer eques/n'm't' equer
SFX c5 erer eres/n'm't' erer
SFX c5 eser eses/n'm't' eser
SFX c5 eter etes/n'm't' eter
SFX c5 etrer etres/n'm't' etrer
SFX c5 evrer evres/n'm't' evrer
SFX c5 eyer eyes/n'm't' eyer
SFX c5 ebrer ebre/n'q'm't's' ebrer
SFX c5 ecer ece/n'q'm't's' ecer
SFX c5 echer eche/n'q'm't's' echer
SFX c5 ecrer ecre/n'q'm't's' ecrer
SFX c5 eder ede/n'q'm't's' eder
SFX c5 eger ege/n'q'm't's' eger
SFX c5 egler egle/n'q'm't's' egler
SFX c5 egner egne/n'q'm't's' egner
SFX c5 egrer egre/n'q'm't's' egrer
SFX c5 eguer egue/n'q'm't's' eguer
SFX c5 eler ele/n'q'm't's' eler
SFX c5 emer eme/n'q'm't's' emer
SFX c5 ener ene/n'q'm't's' ener
SFX c5 eper epe/n'q'm't's' eper
SFX c5 equer eque/n'q'm't's' equer
SFX c5 erer ere/n'q'm't's' erer
SFX c5 eser ese/n'q'm't's' eser
SFX c5 eter ete/n'q'm't's' eter
SFX c5 etrer etre/n'q'm't's' etrer
SFX c5 evrer evre/n'q'm't's' evrer
SFX c5 eyer eye/n'q'm't's' eyer
SFX c5 er ons/n't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer econs/n't' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeons/n't' eger
SFX c5 er ez/n'm' er
SFX c5 ebrer ebrent/n'q'm't's' ebrer
SFX c5 ecer ecent/n'q'm't's' ecer
SFX c5 echer echent/n'q'm't's' echer
SFX c5 ecrer ecrent/n'q'm't's' ecrer
SFX c5 eder edent/n'q'm't's' eder
SFX c5 eger egent/n'q'm't's' eger
SFX c5 egler eglent/n'q'm't's' egler
SFX c5 egner egnent/n'q'm't's' egner
SFX c5 egrer egrent/n'q'm't's' egrer
SFX c5 eguer eguent/n'q'm't's' eguer
SFX c5 eler elent/n'q'm't's' eler
SFX c5 emer ement/n'q'm't's' emer
SFX c5 ener enent/n'q'm't's' ener
SFX c5 eper epent/n'q'm't's' eper
SFX c5 equer equent/n'q'm't's' equer
SFX c5 erer erent/n'q'm't's' erer
SFX c5 eser esent/n'q'm't's' eser
SFX c5 eter etent/n'q'm't's' eter
SFX c5 etrer etrent/n'q'm't's' etrer
SFX c5 evrer evrent/n'q'm't's' evrer
SFX c5 eyer eyent/n'q'm't's' eyer
SFX c5 er ais/n'j'm't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer ecais/n'j'm't' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeais/n'j'm't' eger
SFX c5 er ais/n'm't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer ecais/n'm't' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeais/n'm't' eger
SFX c5 er ait/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer ecait/n'q'm't's' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeait/n'q'm't's' eger
SFX c5 er ions/n't' er
SFX c5 er iez/n'm' er
SFX c5 er aient/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer ecaient/n'q'm't's' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeaient/n'q'm't's' eger
SFX c5 er ai/n'j'm't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer ecai/n'j'm't' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeai/n'j'm't' eger
SFX c5 er as/n'm't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer ecas/n'm't' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeas/n'm't' eger
SFX c5 er a/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer eca/n'q'm't's' ecer
SFX c5 eger egea/n'q'm't's' eger
SFX c5 er ames/n't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer ecames/n't' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeames/n't' eger
SFX c5 er ates/n'm' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer ecates/n'm' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeates/n'm' eger
SFX c5 er erent/n'q'm't's' er
SFX c5 er erai/n'j'm't' er
SFX c5 er eras/n'm't' er
SFX c5 er era/n'q'm't's' er
SFX c5 er erons/n't' er
SFX c5 er erez/n'm' er
SFX c5 er eront/n'q'm't's' er
SFX c5 er erais/n'j'm't' er
SFX c5 er erais/n'm't' er
SFX c5 er erait/n'q'm't's' er
SFX c5 er erions/n't' er
SFX c5 er eriez/n'm' er
SFX c5 er eraient/n'q'm't's' er
SFX c5 ebrer ebre/n'j'm't' ebrer
SFX c5 ecer ece/n'j'm't' ecer
SFX c5 echer eche/n'j'm't' echer
SFX c5 ecrer ecre/n'j'm't' ecrer
SFX c5 eder ede/n'j'm't' eder
SFX c5 eger ege/n'j'm't' eger
SFX c5 egler egle/n'j'm't' egler
SFX c5 egner egne/n'j'm't' egner
SFX c5 egrer egre/n'j'm't' egrer
SFX c5 eguer egue/n'j'm't' eguer
SFX c5 eler ele/n'j'm't' eler
SFX c5 emer eme/n'j'm't' emer
SFX c5 ener ene/n'j'm't' ener
SFX c5 eper epe/n'j'm't' eper
SFX c5 equer eque/n'j'm't' equer
SFX c5 erer ere/n'j'm't' erer
SFX c5 eser ese/n'j'm't' eser
SFX c5 eter ete/n'j'm't' eter
SFX c5 etrer etre/n'j'm't' etrer
SFX c5 evrer evre/n'j'm't' evrer
SFX c5 eyer eye/n'j'm't' eyer
SFX c5 ebrer ebres/n'm't' ebrer
SFX c5 ecer eces/n'm't' ecer
SFX c5 echer eches/n'm't' echer
SFX c5 ecrer ecres/n'm't' ecrer
SFX c5 eder edes/n'm't' eder
SFX c5 eger eges/n'm't' eger
SFX c5 egler egles/n'm't' egler
SFX c5 egner egnes/n'm't' egner
SFX c5 egrer egres/n'm't' egrer
SFX c5 eguer egues/n'm't' eguer
SFX c5 eler eles/n'm't' eler
SFX c5 emer emes/n'm't' emer
SFX c5 ener enes/n'm't' ener
SFX c5 eper epes/n'm't' eper
SFX c5 equer eques/n'm't' equer
SFX c5 erer eres/n'm't' erer
SFX c5 eser eses/n'm't' eser
SFX c5 eter etes/n'm't' eter
SFX c5 etrer etres/n'm't' etrer
SFX c5 evrer evres/n'm't' evrer
SFX c5 eyer eyes/n'm't' eyer
SFX c5 ebrer ebre/n'q'm't's' ebrer
SFX c5 ecer ece/n'q'm't's' ecer
SFX c5 echer eche/n'q'm't's' echer
SFX c5 ecrer ecre/n'q'm't's' ecrer
SFX c5 eder ede/n'q'm't's' eder
SFX c5 eger ege/n'q'm't's' eger
SFX c5 egler egle/n'q'm't's' egler
SFX c5 egner egne/n'q'm't's' egner
SFX c5 egrer egre/n'q'm't's' egrer
SFX c5 eguer egue/n'q'm't's' eguer
SFX c5 eler ele/n'q'm't's' eler
SFX c5 emer eme/n'q'm't's' emer
SFX c5 ener ene/n'q'm't's' ener
SFX c5 eper epe/n'q'm't's' eper
SFX c5 equer eque/n'q'm't's' equer
SFX c5 erer ere/n'q'm't's' erer
SFX c5 eser ese/n'q'm't's' eser
SFX c5 eter ete/n'q'm't's' eter
SFX c5 etrer etre/n'q'm't's' etrer
SFX c5 evrer evre/n'q'm't's' evrer
SFX c5 eyer eye/n'q'm't's' eyer
SFX c5 er ions/n't' er
SFX c5 er iez/n'm' er
SFX c5 ebrer ebrent/n'q'm't's' ebrer
SFX c5 ecer ecent/n'q'm't's' ecer
SFX c5 echer echent/n'q'm't's' echer
SFX c5 ecrer ecrent/n'q'm't's' ecrer
SFX c5 eder edent/n'q'm't's' eder
SFX c5 eger egent/n'q'm't's' eger
SFX c5 egler eglent/n'q'm't's' egler
SFX c5 egner egnent/n'q'm't's' egner
SFX c5 egrer egrent/n'q'm't's' egrer
SFX c5 eguer eguent/n'q'm't's' eguer
SFX c5 eler elent/n'q'm't's' eler
SFX c5 emer ement/n'q'm't's' emer
SFX c5 ener enent/n'q'm't's' ener
SFX c5 eper epent/n'q'm't's' eper
SFX c5 equer equent/n'q'm't's' equer
SFX c5 erer erent/n'q'm't's' erer
SFX c5 eser esent/n'q'm't's' eser
SFX c5 eter etent/n'q'm't's' eter
SFX c5 etrer etrent/n'q'm't's' etrer
SFX c5 evrer evrent/n'q'm't's' evrer
SFX c5 eyer eyent/n'q'm't's' eyer
SFX c5 er asse/n'j'm't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer ecasse/n'j'm't' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeasse/n'j'm't' eger
SFX c5 er asses/n'm't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer ecasses/n'm't' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeasses/n'm't' eger
SFX c5 er at/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer ecat/n'q'm't's' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeat/n'q'm't's' eger
SFX c5 er assions/n't' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer ecassions/n't' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeassions/n't' eger
SFX c5 er assiez/n'm' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer ecassiez/n'm' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeassiez/n'm' eger
SFX c5 er assent/n'q'm't's' [^cg]er
SFX c5 ecer ecassent/n'q'm't's' ecer
SFX c5 eger egeassent/n'q'm't's' eger
