dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.dic
abceder/c4a+()
abreger/c4a+()
acceder/c5()
accelerer/c4a+()
adherer/c5()
aerer/c4a+()
agglomerer/c4a+()
agreger/c4a+()
aliener/c4a+()
alleger/c4a+()
alterer/c4a+()
assecher/c4a+()
averer/c4a+()
ebrecher/c4a+()
empoussierer/c4a+()
enfievrer/c4a+()
entenebrer/c4a+()
exagerer/c4a+()
exasperer/c4a+()
exonerer/c4a+()
hebeter/c4a+()
hypothequer/c4a+()
impregner/c4a+()
ingerer/c4a+()
inquieter/c4a+()
inserer/c4a+()
integrer/c4a+()
interpreter/c4a+()
oberer/c4a+()
obtemperer/c5()
operer/c4a+()
oxygener/c4a+()
ulcerer/c4a+()
